Utah statutes.
9-6-605.   Board -- Duties.
(1)  The board is the policymaking body for the office.
(2)  The board shall, in consultation with the director of the office:
(a)  set policies and, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act, make rules governing:
(i)  the office grants program; and
(ii)  the awarding of grants to assist Utah's eligible museums; and
(b)  set eligibility guidelines for grants administered through the office.
(3) (a)  By September 30 of each year, the board shall prepare and submit a
request to the governor and the Legislature for prioritized capital facilities
grants to be awarded to eligible museums under this part.
(b)  The board shall prepare a list of the requested capital facilities grants
in a prioritized order and include a written explanation of:
(i)  the total grant amount requested in the list; and
(ii)  the basis of its prioritization of requested grants on the list.
(c)  The board shall accept applications for capital facilities grants through
June 1 of each year, prior to compiling and submitting its yearly request to
the governor and the Legislature under Subsection (3)(a).
